District of Columbia statutes.
7-2341.18

Judicial review.

A person or entity aggrieved by a decision of the Office of Administrative Hearings may appeal the decision to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals in accordance with Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.] and pursuant to Chapter 18A of Title 2 [§ 2-1831.01 et seq.].

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-357, § 19, 56 DCR 1167
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 56(a), 59 DCR 6190
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 deleted the comma preceding “in” and the comma preceding “and.”